Arkansas, session 2025, SB410.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 21, Chapter 8, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
21-8-105. Disclosure by former state employees and former elected
officials – Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Former elected official" includes without limitation a
person previously elected to the following offices:
(A) Governor;
(B) Lieutenant Governor;
(C) Secretary of State;
(D) Attorney General;
(E) Treasurer of State;
(F) Auditor of State;
*SSS027*
03-18-2025 10:36:22 SSS027

As Engrossed: S3/18/25 SB410
(G) Commissioner of State Lands; or
(H) Member of the General Assembly;
(2) "Former state employee" means a person who was previously
regularly appointed or employed in a position of state service by a state
agency, for which he or she was compensated on a full-time or part-time
basis; and
(3) "State agency" means every department, division, office,
board, commission, and institution of this state, including state-supported
institutions of higher education.
(b)(1) For a period of four (4) years from the end of his or her
employment or his or her term of elected office, a former state employee or
former elected official shall disclose the following activities to the
Arkansas Ethics Commission:
(A) Knowingly entering into employment with an individual,
business, or other entity that was awarded a contract by his or her state
agency or elected office during his or her employment or his or her term of
elected office; or
(B) Knowingly selling a good or commodity to an
individual, business, or other entity that was awarded a contract by his or
her state agency or elected office during his or her employment or his or her
term of elected office.
(2) The disclosure under subdivision (b)(1) of this section
shall be filed within thirty (30) days of the employment or sale.
(3) Once the initial disclosure is filed under subdivision
(b)(2) of this section, the former state employee or former elected official
shall file a disclosure quarterly until he or she:
(A) Is no longer knowingly employed with an individual,
business, or other entity that was awarded a contract by his or her state
agency or elected office during his or her employment or his or her term of
elected office;
(B) Is no longer knowingly selling a good or commodity to
an individual, business, or other entity that was awarded a contract by his
or her state agency or elected office during his or her employment or his or
her term of elected office; or
(C) Has been a former state employee or former elected
official for a period of more than four (4) years from the end of his or her
03-18-2025 10:36:22 SSS027

As Engrossed: S3/18/25 SB410
employment or his or her term of elected office.
(c) The commission shall promulgate rules to implement this section,
including without limitation a rule creating the form for the disclosure
required under subsection (b) of this section.
(d) This section expires on June 30, 2029, unless extended by the
General Assembly.
/s/B. King





























03-18-2025 10:36:22 SSS027